dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
inamóris/T0N0-1'0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:inamorar dp:in
in-amore/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0-1'0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:in-amorar
gonfiar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-1*0'0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
gónfis/T0N0-1*0'0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:gonfiar
inparar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2'0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
inpàris/T0N0'0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:inparar
véer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2'0@0^0^7.0^6^1	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
vede/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7'0@0^0^7^6^1	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:véder
vegado/M2F0F3A0y0y1'0@0^0^7.0^6^1	po:verb vt:participle+passive+weak va:buranèl st:véder
veđe/T0t0T2T3N0N2L0L2I5'0@0^0^7.0^6^1	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:véđer
vexerò/T0T1T2T3T6N0N1N2N3N4N6L1L2L3L5l1l2l3l5W3w3'0@0^0^7.0^6^1	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular st:véxer
vèñe/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N7L0L2l0l2I5I7'0@0^8-1+0^4^7^a^2.0*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:veñir
vole/T0t0T2T3N0N2L0L2I5A0'0+0*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:volar
vóƚis/T0'0+0*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:voƚar
vòje/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N7L0L2I5'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:voler
vójis/T0N0'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:voler
voƚe/T0t1T2T3l0l2I7'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:voƚer
vosudo/M2F0F3A0y0y1'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:participle+passive+strong st:voler
vòlva/F2'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:participle+passive+strong is:singular is:femenine st:voler
vuoƚer/T0T1T2T3T8l1l2l3w2w3P0P2xH'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
vuò/I3'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular st:vuoler
voltar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2-0-1+0.0*0^6'0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
voxar/T0T1T2T3N0N1N2N4L1L2L3l1l2l3W1P0P1P2'0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
vude/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0'0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:vudar
purasai/Pv'9	po:adverb
purasèi/'9	po:adverb
al/'1	po:article_definite is:femenine
el/'1	po:article_definite
la/F2'9Vp	po:article_definite is:femenine
na/'9	po:article_indefinite is:femenine
un/'1	po:article_indefinite al:u’
la/F2'9Vp	po:article_personal is:femenine
eo/'9	po:pronoun_free_indirect is:first is:neuter va:buranèl
eo/'9	po:pronoun_free_reflexive is:first is:neuter va:buranèl
eo/'9	po:pronoun_free_subject is:first is:neuter va:buranèl
vu/'9	po:pronoun_free_indirect is:second is:plural is:neuter al:’u
vu/'9	po:pronoun_free_reflexive is:second is:plural is:neuter al:’u
vu/'9	po:pronoun_free_subject is:second is:plural is:neuter al:’u
ge/'9	po:pronoun_clitic_complement_indirect is:third is:plural is:neuter
nde/'9	po:pronoun_clitic_complement_direct is:first is:neuter is:plural is:apheresis st:ende al:dé
nde/'9	po:pronoun_clitic_complement_indirect is:first is:neuter is:plural is:apheresis st:ende al:dé
ne/'9	po:pronoun_clitic_complement_direct is:first is:neuter is:plural
ne/'9	po:pronoun_clitic_complement_indirect is:first is:neuter is:plural
se/'9	po:pronoun_clitic_reflexive is:first is:plural is:neuter
se/'9	po:pronoun_clitic_reflexive is:third is:neuter
en/'1	po:pronoun_partitive is:neuter
nde/'9	po:pronoun_partitive is:neuter is:apheresis st:ende al:dé
ne/'9	po:pronoun_partitive is:neuter
ge/'9	po:pronoun_locative_existential is:neuter
ge/'9	po:pronoun_locative_referential is:neuter
sta/F2'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_near is:femenine
sto/M2'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_near
dove/'9	po:pronoun_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter st:ove al:doe al:dó al:don
inonde/'0	po:pronoun_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter pa:in pa:onde
unde/'9	po:pronoun_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter al:de al:un
sta/F2'9	po:adjective_demonstrative_near is:femenine
sto/M2'9	po:adjective_demonstrative_near
adove/'9	po:adjective_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter st:andove al:adó
andove/'9	po:adjective_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter al:andoe
dove/'9	po:adjective_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter st:ove al:doe al:dó al:don
inonde/'0	po:adjective_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter pa:in pa:onde
in/'1	po:preposition
inté/'0	po:preposition al:int
X/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
XX/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
XXX/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
L/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
C/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
D/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
M/%2%3	po:numeral_latin
m/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
g/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
s/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
l/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
A/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
K/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
mol/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Hz/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
N/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Pa/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
J/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
W/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Pl/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
C/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
V/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Ω/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
S/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
F/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
T/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Wb/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
H/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
sr/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
lm/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
lx/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Bq/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Gy/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Sv/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
kat/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
b/$0$3Z0	po:unit_of_measure
B/$0$3Z0	po:unit_of_measure
eV/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Da/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
u/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
au/$0Z0	po:unit_of_measure
bar/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
mmHg/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Torr/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Å/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
Np/$0$1$2Z0	po:unit_of_measure
kolúi/'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_far
koƚúi/'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_far
de/'9	po:preposition
ke/'9	po:pronoun_relative is:neuter
plui/'9	po:adjective_qualificative ct:uncountable is:neuter
plui/'9	po:adverb
volontèra/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
vui/'0	po:pronoun_free_subject is:second is:plural is:neuter
ankoi/'9	po:adverb
anpòi/'9	po:adverb pa:anka pa:pòi
daspòi/'9	po:preposition
voƚentièra/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voƚontièra/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voƚentèr/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
asai/Pv'9	po:adverb
dapòi/'9	po:adverb
dapòi/'9	po:preposition
asèi/'9	po:quantifier_existential is:neuter
anpòi/'9	po:conjunction pa:anka pa:pòi
dapuòi/'9	po:adverb
kome/'9	po:adjective_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter al:kom al:kon
kome/^a'9	po:adverb al:kom al:kon
kuelúi/'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_near
kuestúi/'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_near
voƚuntèra/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
asai/A0Pv'9	po:quantifier_existential is:neuter
inikuo/M2F0F3'0	po:adjective_qualificative dp:in
voƚuntièra/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
anansi/'0	po:preposition
voƚentèra/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
kulúi/'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_far
voƚontièr/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voƚuntèri/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
dopòi/'9	po:adverb
anbedoe/'9	po:quantifier_universal_effective is:femenine
aƚora/'0	po:adverb pa:a pa:ƚa pa:ora
ankuòi/'9	po:adverb
inonde/'0	po:adverb pa:in pa:onde
kustúi/'9	po:pronoun_demonstrative_near
ove/'9	po:adverb al:dove al:oe
voxion/M1M2F0F1B1Bu'0	po:noun st:voxie ds:on
daspuòi/'9	po:preposition
live/Vp'9'0	po:adverb
volentièr/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
asae/'0	po:adverb
livelòndena/'0	po:adverb
vòƚega/F2'0	po:noun is:femenine al:vuòƚega
livaƚò/Vp'0	po:adverb pa:live pa:lado
lanèr/M0M2Buv0'0	po:noun
voƚentiera/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voƚintièra/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
gonfiesa/F2e2'0	po:noun is:femenine st:gonfio ds:eŧa
andove/'9	po:pronoun_interrogative_exclamatory is:neuter al:andoe
nu/'9	po:pronoun_free_reflexive is:first is:plural is:neuter
agostan/M0M2F0F3B1Bu'0	po:adjective_qualificative
agúi/'9	po:noun
volariva/F2'0	po:noun is:femenine
vargòña/F2'0	po:noun is:femenine
voƚintiera/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
volàrega/F2'0	po:noun is:femenine
onkoi/'9	po:adverb
livalòndena/'0	po:adverb
onkòi/'9	po:adverb
unkoi/'9	po:adverb
varadora/F2v0'0	po:noun is:femenine
voƚentèri/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voƚentièri/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voƚetèr/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voƚontèr/^7'0	po:adverb lg:french
voltamento/M2A0Vr-1+0.0*0'0	po:noun ds:mento
